src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexd
LEXICON Set_B
<SetB.Sg1>:in\<
<SetB.Sg2>:at\<
<SetB.Sg3>:\<
<SetB.Pl1>:oo\<
<SetB.Pl2>:ex\<
<SetB.Pl3>:e'\<

LEXICON Set_A
#in/w
<SetA.Sg1>:{SetA.Sg1}{SetA.Sg1}\<

#aa/aaw
<SetA.Sg2>:aa{SetA.Sg2}\<

#x/r
<SetA.Sg3>:{Sg3I}{SetA.Sg3}\<

#ee/eer
<SetA.Pl2>:ee{SetA.Pl2}\<

#e'x/e'r
<SetA.Pl3>:e'{SetA.Pl3}\<

#qa/q
<SetA.Pl1>:q{SetA.Pl1}\<

LEXICON Pluralizer
<Pl>:\>eb'
